SciBin2/dics/ru_RU.dic
бдеть/BGLLNp
бздеть/BGLLNp
бузить/BBLLNp
быть/BGLLNp
восхотеть/BGLLNp
выбыть/BGLLNp
выгнить/LLNp
выгрестись/BgLlNp
галдеть/BGLLNp
гнить/LLNp
грести/BgLlNpSKSNSPSXSgSkSmSrSusMsPsUsYTF
дерзить/BBLLNp
добыть/BGLLNp
догнить/LLNp
дотрындеться/BGLLNp
дудеть/BGLLNp
ерундить/BBLLNp
есть/BGLLNpSKSNSPSQSXShSkSmSrSusPsUsYTF
есться/BGLLNpSFSGSKSPSXShSksMsPsU
забздеть/BGLLNp
забыть/BGLLNp
загалдеть/BGLLNp
загнить/LLNp
загундеть/BGLLNp
зарысить/BBLLNp
затмить/BBLLNp
затмиться/BBLLNp
захотеть/BGLLNp
захотеться/LmNp
избыть/BGLLNp
избыться/BGLLNp
изгнить/LLNp
клясть/BBLLNpSPsP
клясться/BBLLNpSPSr
кудесить/BbLLNp
лечь/BGLMNpSJSPSXShSkSmSrSuSxsMsNsPsY
лихорадить/BbLLNp
лямзить/BBLLNp
ляпсить/BBLLNp
мерзить/BBLLNp
набузить/BBLLNp
нагнить/LLNp
надгнить/LLNp
надерзить/BBLLNp
надоесть/BGLLNpSu
наерундить/BBLLNp
накудесить/BbLLNp
начудесить/BbLLNp
начудить/BBLLNp
нашкодить/BbLLNp
обгнить/LLNp
обезлесить/BbLLNp
обезлеситься/BbLLNp
обезлошадить/BbLLNp
облесить/BBLLNp
обрусить/BBLLNp
обуржуазить/BbLLNp
обуржуазиться/BbLLNp
огрестись/BgLlNp
опочить/LLBgNp
отбыть/BGLLNp
отгнить/LLNp
отгрестись/BgLlNp
отхотеть/BGLLNp
очутиться/BBLLNp
перегнить/LLNp
перезабыть/BGLLNp
перезабыться/BGLLNp
переубедить/BBLLNp
переубедиться/BBLLNp
победить/BBLLNp
побыть/BGLLNp
погалдеть/BGLLNp
погнить/LLNp
подгнить/LLNp
подгрестись/BgLlNp
подзабыть/BGLLNp
позабыть/BGLLNp
позабыться/BGLLNp
почить/LLBgNp
почтить/BBLLNp
пребыть/BGLLNp
прибыть/BGLLNp
пригрестись/BgLlNp
прийти/BBLLNpYy
прийтись/BBLLNpYy
пробыть/BGLLNp
прогнить/LLNp
разгалдеться/BGLLNp
раздобыть/BGLLNp
разлечься/BGLMNp
разрастись/BBLmNp
разубедить/BBLLNp
разубедиться/BBLLNp
расти/BBLmNpSFSGSJSKSNSPSXShSkSmSrSusMsPTJ
расхотеть/BGLLNp
расхотеться/LmNp
росить/LmNp
роситься/LmNp
рысить/BBLLNp
сбондить/BBLLNp
сбрендить/BBLLNp
сбыть/BGLLNp
сбыться/BGLLNp
сгнить/LLNp
сгрестись/BgLlNp
скрести/BgLlNpSKSNSPSXSgSkSmSrSusPTB
скрестись/BgLlNpSNSPSXSrsP
слямзить/BBLLNp
сляпсить/BBLLNp
срастись/BBLmNp
стичь/BBLMNpSNSPSXSrsM
тмить/BBLLNp
тмиться/BBLLNp
убедить/BBLLNp
убедиться/BBLLNp
убыть/BGLLNp
угобзить/BBLLNp
угораздить/BBLLNp
улечься/BGLMNpSrsM
умилосердить/BBLLNp
хотеть/BGLLNp
хотеться/LmNp
хохмить/BBLLNp
чтить/BBLLNp
чудесить/BbLLNp
чудить/BBLLNp
шкодить/BbLLNp
